California, session 20252026, AB1593.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11093.9 is added to the Government Code, to read:On11093.9. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Category” means the statutory or regulatory provision authorizing a charge, including the program or fund into which the revenue is deposited.(2) “Monetary charge” means fees, fines, penalties, assessments, licenses, and other payments imposed by statute or regulation.(3) “State agency” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11000.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, a state agency that imposes a monetary charge, including a regulatory fee or administrative penalty, shall report on its internet website the revenue generated from those charges, organized by category.(c) The report required by subdivision (b) shall be published in a machine-readable format and made available for download on the department’s internet website in accordance with standards established by the Department of Finance.